Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1776.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the unavailability of the secure automated firearms e-check (SAFE) background check system for firearm transfers in November 2024 resulted in inconvenience and likely significant economic loss to firearms purchasers and licensed firearms dealers in Washington state, in addition to the possible denial of legal firearms purchases or transfers to Washington residents. The legislature further finds that a refund of background check fees should be provided to firearms purchasers, and to licensed firearms dealers who covered the costs of background check fees for purchasers, for fees collected during the time period the SAFE background check system was unable to access the administrative office of the courts data system for the purpose of completing background checks during November 2024.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW to read as follows:The Washington state patrol firearms background check program shall provide reimbursement of firearm background check fees charged under RCW 43.43.580 during the period that the secure automated firearms e-check (SAFE) background check system was unable to access the administrative office of the courts data system for the purpose of completing background checks during the month of November 2024. The Washington state patrol firearms background check program shall establish a process to provide reimbursement to: Any applicant for the purchase or transfer of a firearm who paid background check fees during this time period; and any licensed firearms dealer who provides documentation that the dealer covered the cost of background check fees for applicants applying for the purchase or transfer of a firearm during this time period. The Washington state patrol firearms background check program may provide reimbursement from funds in the state firearms background check system account created in RCW 43.43.590.--- END ---